Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE M. DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES

CHAPTER 1002. RULES

Sec. 1002.001. GENERAL RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. The board may adopt any rules necessary and appropriate to implement the powers and duties of the department under this code and other laws of this state.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1002.002. RULES RESTRICTING ADVERTISING OR COMPETITIVE BIDDING. The board may not adopt rules restricting advertising or competitive bidding by a person regulated by the department except to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices by the person.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2009.